Washington statutes.
RCW 4.16.370

Actions against personal representative or trustee for breach of fiduciary duties—Statute of limitations.

The statute of limitations for actions against a personal representative or trustee for breach of fiduciary duties is as set forth in RCW 11.96A.070.

[ 1999 c 42 s 602; 1985 c 11 s 3. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1999 c 42: See RCW 11.96A.902.

Short title—Application—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 and 11.02.901.

Purpose—Severability—1985 c 11: See notes following RCW 4.16.110.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.